Washington statutes.
RCW 43.115.045

Executive director.

(1) The commission shall be administered by an executive director, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall base the appointment of the executive director on recommendations of the commission. The salary of the executive director shall be set by the governor.

(2) The executive director shall employ a staff, who shall be state employees pursuant to Title 41 RCW. The executive director shall prescribe the duties of the staff as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 261 s 4.]